Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1102
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Dentistry Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-1102.01 to 38-1113 apply.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 435;

Laws 2015, LB80, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB18, § 2.